Utah statutes.
19-6-402.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Abatement action" means action taken to limit, reduce, mitigate, or
eliminate a release from an underground storage tank or petroleum storage
tank, or to limit or reduce, mitigate, or eliminate the damage caused by that
release.
(2)  "Board" means the Solid and Hazardous Waste Control Board created in
Section 19-1-106.
(3)  "Bodily injury" means bodily harm, sickness, disease, or death sustained
by any person.
(4)  "Certificate of compliance" means a certificate issued to a facility by
the executive secretary:
(a)  demonstrating that an owner or operator of a facility containing one or
more petroleum storage tanks has met the requirements of this part; and
(b)  listing all tanks at the facility, specifying which tanks may receive
petroleum and which tanks have not met the requirements for compliance.
(5)  "Certificate of registration" means a certificate issued to a facility by
the executive secretary demonstrating that an owner or operator of a facility
containing one or more underground storage tanks has:
(a)  registered the tanks; and
(b)  paid the annual underground storage tank fee.
(6) (a)  "Certified underground storage tank consultant" means any person who:
(i)  meets the education and experience standards established by the board
under Subsection 19-6-403(1)(a)(vi) in order to provide or contract to provide
information, opinions, or advice relating to underground storage tank
management, release abatement, investigation, corrective action, or evaluation
for a fee, or in connection with the services for which a fee is charged; and
(ii)  has submitted an application to the board and received a written
statement of certification from the board.
(b)  "Certified underground storage tank consultant" does not include:
(i)  an employee of the owner or operator of the underground storage tank, or
an employee of a business operation that has a business relationship with the
owner or operator of the underground storage tank, and that markets petroleum
products or manages underground storage tanks; or
(ii)  persons licensed to practice law in this state who offer only legal
advice on underground storage tank management, release abatement,
investigation, corrective action, or evaluation.
(7)  "Closed" means an underground storage tank no longer in use that has
been:
(a)  emptied and cleaned to remove all liquids and accumulated sludges; and
(b)  either removed from the ground or filled with an inert solid material.
(8)  "Corrective action plan" means a plan for correcting a release from a
petroleum storage tank that includes provisions for all or any of the
following:
(a)  cleanup or removal of the release;
(b)  containment or isolation of the release;
(c)  treatment of the release;
(d)  correction of the cause of the release;
(e)  monitoring and maintenance of the site of the release;
(f)  provision of alternative water supplies to persons whose drinking water
has become contaminated by the release; or
(g)  temporary or permanent relocation, whichever is determined by the
executive secretary to be more cost-effective, of persons whose dwellings have
been determined by the executive secretary to be no longer habitable due to
the release.
(9)  "Costs" means any monies expended for:
(a)  investigation;
(b)  abatement action;
(c)  corrective action;
(d)  judgments, awards, and settlements for bodily injury or property damage
to third parties;
(e)  legal and claims adjusting costs incurred by the state in connection with
judgments, awards, or settlements for bodily injury or property damage to
third parties; or
(f)  costs incurred by the state risk manager in determining the actuarial
soundness of the fund.
(10)  "Covered by the fund" means the requirements of Section 19-6-424 have
been met.
(11)  "Dwelling" means a building that is usually occupied by a person lodging
there at night.
(12)  "Enforcement proceedings" means a civil action or the procedures to
enforce orders established by Section 19-6-425.
(13)  "Executive secretary" means the executive secretary of the board.
(14)  "Facility" means all underground storage tanks located on a single
parcel of property or on any property adjacent or contiguous to that parcel.
(15)  "Fund" means the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund created in Section
19-6-409.
(16)  "Loan fund" means the Petroleum Storage Tank Loan Fund created in
Section 19-6-405.3.
(17)  "Operator" means any person in control of or who is responsible on a
daily basis for the maintenance of an underground storage tank that is in use
for the storage, use, or dispensing of a regulated substance.
(18)  "Owner" means:
(a)  in the case of an underground storage tank in use on or after November 8,
1984, any person who owns an underground storage tank used for the storage,
use, or dispensing of a regulated substance; and
(b)  in the case of any underground storage tank in use before November 8,
1984, but not in use on or after November 8, 1984, any person who owned the
tank immediately before the discontinuance of its use for the storage, use, or
dispensing of a regulated substance.
(19)  "Petroleum" includes crude oil or any fraction of crude oil that is
liquid at 60 degrees Fahrenheit and at a pressure of 14.7 pounds per square
inch absolute.
(20)  "Petroleum storage tank" means a tank that:
(a) (i)  is underground;
(ii)  is regulated under Subtitle I of the Resource Conservation and Recovery
Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 6991c, et seq.; and
(iii)  contains petroleum; or
(b)  is a tank that the owner or operator voluntarily submits for
participation in the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund under Section 19-6-415.
(21)  "Petroleum Storage Tank Restricted Account" means the account created in
Section 19-6-405.5.
(22)  "Program" means the Environmental Assurance Program under Section
19-6-410.5.
(23)  "Property damage" means physical injury to or destruction of tangible
property including loss of use of that property.
(24)  "Regulated substance" means petroleum and petroleum-based substances
comprised of a complex blend of hydrocarbons derived from crude oil through
processes of separation, conversion, upgrading, and finishing, and includes
motor fuels, jet fuels, distillate fuel oils, residual fuel oils, lubricants,
petroleum solvents, and used oils.
(25)  "Release" means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping,
leaching, or disposing from an underground storage tank or petroleum storage
tank.  The entire release is considered a single release.
(26) (a)  "Responsible party" means any person who:
(i)  is the owner or operator of a facility;
(ii)  owns or has legal or equitable title in a facility or an underground
storage tank;
(iii)  owned or had legal or equitable title in the facility at the time any
petroleum was received or contained at the facility;
(iv)  operated or otherwise controlled activities at the facility at the time
any petroleum was received or contained at the facility; or
(v)  is an underground storage tank installation company.
(b)  "Responsible party" as defined in Subsections (26)(a)(i), (ii), and (iii)
does not include:
(i)  any person who is not an operator and, without participating in the
management of a facility and otherwise not engaged in petroleum production,
refining, and marketing, holds indicia of ownership:
(A)  primarily to protect his security interest in the facility; or
(B)  as a fiduciary or custodian under Title 75, Utah Uniform Probate Code, or
under an employee benefit plan; or
(ii)  governmental ownership or control of property by involuntary transfers
as provided in CERCLA Section 101(20)(D), 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601(20)(D).
(c)  The exemption created by Subsection (b)(i)(B) does not apply to actions
taken by the state or its officials or agencies under this part.
(d)  The terms and activities "indicia of ownership," "primarily to protect a
security interest," "participation in management," and "security interest"
under this part are in accordance with 40 CFR Part 280, Subpart I, as amended,
and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6991b(h)(9).
(e)  The terms "participate in management" and "indicia of ownership" as
defined in 40 CFR Part 280, Subpart I, as amended, and 42 U.S.C. Sec.
6991b(h)(9) include and apply to the fiduciaries listed in Subsection
(26)(b)(i)(B).
(27)  "Soil test" means a test, established or approved by board rule, to
detect the presence of petroleum in soil.
(28)  "State cleanup appropriation" means the money appropriated by the
Legislature to the department to fund the investigation, abatement, and
corrective action regarding releases not covered by the fund.
(29)  "Underground storage tank" means any tank regulated under Subtitle I,
Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6991c, et seq.,
including:
(a)  a petroleum storage tank;
(b)  underground pipes and lines connected to a storage tank; and
(c)  any underground ancillary equipment and containment system.
(30)  "Underground storage tank installation company" means any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, association, or other
organization who installs underground storage tanks.
(31)  "Underground storage tank installation company permit" means a permit
issued to an underground storage tank installation company by the executive
secretary.
(32)  "Underground storage tank technician" means a person employed by and
acting under the direct supervision of a certified underground storage tank
consultant to assist in carrying out the functions described in Subsection
(6)(a).
